Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.240

Reconciling duplicate or conflicting no-contact or protection orders.

(1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop guidelines by December 1, 2011, for all courts to establish a process to reconcile duplicate or conflicting no-contact or protection orders issued by courts in this state.

(2) The guidelines developed under subsection (1) of this section must include:

(a) A process to allow any party named in a no-contact or protection order to petition for the purpose of reconciling duplicate or conflicting orders; and

(b) A procedure to address no-contact and protection order data sharing between court jurisdictions in this state.

(3) By January 1, 2011, the administrative office of the courts shall provide a report back to the legislature concerning the progress made to develop the guidelines required by this section.

[ 2010 c 274 s 310.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 c 274: See note following RCW 10.31.100.